Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Incentive Grants

§ 2841.
Establishment; rules.

A need-based grant program is hereby established to aid students who need financial assistance and are pursuing undergraduate studies and give promise of completing satisfactorily a degree program or who have been accepted for admission to an approved postsecondary education institution for undergraduate studies. The Board may establish rules, regulations, and standards for the awards under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 5(a); amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 2842.
Eligibility.

To qualify for an incentive grant for the first year of undergraduate study, a student must be in attendance at an approved postsecondary education institution or be accepted for admission and be enrolled as a full-time or part-time student at such an institution. For each year following the first year of undergraduate study, the student must have been certified by the institution attended to be in good standing and to give promise of satisfactory completion of a course of study leading to a degree or diploma.

Any qualified person may apply for an incentive grant in addition to any other scholarship aid.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 5(b), (g); amended

1967, No. 371

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 27, 1968;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 2843.
Applications, certificates, and reports.

The recipient must apply for an incentive grant at least annually. Grants may be for a maximum of five full-time equivalent school years.

Each applicant for an incentive grant shall furnish a certificate of income with the application. Attached to the certificate shall be a form of consent, executed by the student and any other required persons, granting permission to the Vermont Commissioner of Taxes to disclose the income tax information required by subsection (c) of this section.

The Vermont Commissioner of Taxes, when requested by the Corporation, shall compare any certificate filed pursuant to this subchapter with the State income tax returns filed by the persons making such certificate and shall report any instances of discrepancy to the Corporation.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 5(b), (d), (e), (f); amended

1967, No. 131

, § 5;

1967, No. 371

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1968;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 29

, § 5.

§ 2844.
Amount received; proration.

Each undergraduate student who qualifies for an incentive grant shall apply on forms provided by the Corporation. The Corporation may consider the student for an incentive grant if the student meets the need-based eligibility standards established by the Board. These standards shall give due consideration to all relevant factors affecting the student’s need, including the adjusted gross income and other sources of income of the student’s parents; the adjusted gross income and other sources of income of a nondependent student; the assets of parents and students; the number of a parent’s or nondependent student’s children who are students enrolled in approved postsecondary education institutions at the same time; and any unusual circumstances that affect the family financial strength. Incentive grants shall be awarded on a rolling basis to eligible applicants based upon established need, and in total amount shall not exceed the funds made available from legislative appropriation or other sources. In no case shall a student’s award be larger than that needed to attend the approved postsecondary education institution of the student’s choice.

The Corporation may prorate incentive grants on the basis of semesters, other recognized portions of a school year, or course load.

Vermont resident students enrolled at the Medical College of the University of Vermont or enrolled in a program leading to the degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine shall be eligible to apply for an incentive grant and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section. In addition, veterinary students shall be eligible for grants not to exceed twice the amount of the average grant award made to full-time undergraduate students in the previous year under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 5(c), (h); amended

1967, No. 131

,§§ 6, 7;

1967, No. 371

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 27, 1968;

1969, No. 89

;

1971, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 28, 1972;

1975, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.);

1995, No. 63

, § 188;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 186, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 2845.
Trust fund; grants; students in Department for Children and Families custody.

The Board shall establish a trust fund to be used to provide grants for students who do not have parental support and are or have been under the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families. The Board may draw up to 90 percent of the assets in the fund for these purposes.

The trust fund shall consist of:

funds appropriated by the General Assembly; and

any gifts, grants, or contributions made to the trust fund.

The Board may determine whether the trust fund is to be managed by the State Treasurer or by a private firm contracted at the direction of the Board.

Any amount remaining in the trust fund at the end of any fiscal year and any interest accruing to the trust fund shall remain in the fund.

A child who is under the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, or a young adult between the ages of 18 and 24 who was under the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families for at least six months when that person was between the ages of 16 and 18, and who is accepted for degree study at the Vermont State Colleges, the University of Vermont, or a Vermont independent college, is eligible for an annual grant under this section, to the extent that funds are available in the trust fund. Upon certification by the Vermont State Colleges, the University of Vermont, or a Vermont independent college that a Vermont resident student who is eligible under this section has matriculated in a degree program at a Vermont college or university, the student may receive a grant if the student’s financial aid eligibility leaves remaining financial need following the student and the family contributions, if any, and the availability of all other sources of gift aid. Each grant, together with the student and the family contributions, if any, and all other sources of gift aid, shall not exceed the full cost of tuition, fees, room, and board, and no individual annual grant may exceed $3,000.00. The Board may prorate the funds appropriated for use under this section where the collective need of the eligible applicants exceeds the funds appropriated. In addition, the Board may prorate a grant based on a student’s full- or part-time enrollment status.

A person may receive a grant under this section for each of up to six consecutive years. A young adult who receives a grant under this section prior to reaching 25 years of age shall continue to be eligible for grants under this section until six years from the date of matriculation or until he or she has obtained an undergraduate degree, whichever comes first.

The Board shall coordinate implementation of this section with the Commissioner for Children and Families, the President of the Association of Vermont Independent Colleges, the Chancellor of the Vermont State Colleges, and the President of the University of Vermont. The Board may establish procedures and policies or adopt rules to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 72

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 6, 2004; amended

2011, No. 58

, § 12, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 187, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 2846.
Advancement grants.

The Corporation may establish an advancement grant program for residents pursuing nondegree education and training opportunities who do not meet the definition of student in subdivision 2822(3) of this title, and who may not meet the requirements of this subchapter.

Advancement grants may be used at institutions that are not approved postsecondary education institutions.

The Corporation may adopt rules or establish policies, procedures, standards, and forms for advancement grants, including the requirements for applying for and using the grants and the eligibility requirements for the institutions where the grants may be used.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

2019, No. 80

, § 4.